District of Columbia statutes.
38-233

Alternative educational programs.

The Board of Education shall provide to any student who is expelled from school in accordance with this subchapter an alternative educational program at the D.C. Street Academy, at another existing alternative educational program, or at any alternative educational program that may be established in the future. Not later than 90 days after the effective date of this subchapter:

(1)

The Mayor and the Board of Education shall submit a report to the Council delineating a comprehensive plan for providing alternative educational services to a student who has been expelled from a District of Columbia Public School setting.

(2)

The comprehensive plan shall include a description of the alternative education services to be provided to an expelled student, each location where the alternative education services shall be provided, and the estimated annual cost of providing the alternative education services.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-174, § 2(c), 43 DCR 4500
1981 Ed., § 31-453.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 38-231.
For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 38-231.